Maryland, session 2026, HB0740.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–401.
(a) With the assistance of the county health department, each county board shall
provide:
(1) Adequate school health services;
(2) Instruction in health education, including the importance of physical
activity in maintaining good health; and
(3) A healthful school environment.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0740*

HOUSE BILL 740
(b) The Department and the Maryland Department of Health jointly shall:
(1) Develop public standards and guidelines for school health programs;
and
(2) Offer assistance to the county boards and county health departments
in their implementation.
(c) (1) (i) Each county board shall designate a school health services
program coordinator.
(ii) A county board may authorize the county health department to
designate the school health services program coordinator.
(2) The school health services program coordinator shall:
(i) Implement State and local health policies in the public schools;
(ii) Ensure that public schools adhere to local health services
guidelines; and
(iii) Communicate State and local health policies to the parents and
guardians of public school students.
(3) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the
county board shall grant the school health services program coordinator the authority to
carry out the provisions of this subsection.
(ii) The county board shall consult with a county superintendent
before any change in the hiring or termination of personnel in connection with a school
health services program.
(4) The Department shall conduct at least two meetings annually with all
school health services program coordinators in the State.
(D) (1) EACH PUBLIC SCHOOL SHALL EMPLOY A FULL–TIME THERAPIST
THAT PROVIDES SCHOOL–BASED MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES TO STUDENTS DURING
THE INSTRUCTIONAL DAY.
(2) THE THERAPIST EMPLOYED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE LICENSED AND CERTIFIED BY THE STATE BOARD OF
PROFESSIONAL COUNSELORS AND THERAPISTS.
[(d)] (E) On or before December 1, 2015, and every 5 years thereafter, the
Department shall report to the Governor and, subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government

HOUSE BILL 740 3
Article, to the General Assembly a summary of the information reported to the State
Superintendent during the COMAR certification process.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.